Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6011.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 112a. (1) The legislature finds that large-scale solar energy facilities, including those that utilize inverter-based control systems and colocated energy storage, present unique cyber-physical safety risks. This section is enacted solely to address public health, safety, and emergency-response risks related to the safe operation of large-scale solar energy facilities. This section does not regulate cybersecurity generally, does not regulate data centers or digital data infrastructure, and is not intended to establish a model or precedent applicable to other energy resources or infrastructure sectors. This section establishes reasonable, scalable, risk-based cybersecurity and resilience obligations applicable only to operators of large-scale solar energy facilities, without mandating any specific technologies, vendors, workforce structures, or compliance frameworks. This section is intended to operate in harmony with applicable federal cybersecurity standards and guidance and does not require duplicative compliance where applicable federal cybersecurity requirements address the same risk. (2) This section does not regulate siting, permitting, or the approval of large-scale solar energy facilities, does not create a new regulatory program, and does not expand rule-making, supervisory, or programmatic oversight authority of any state agency. (3) A person or organization that operates a large-scale solar energy facility shall maintain reasonable security measures to protect safety-critical systems from cyber compromise that could reasonably impair safe operations by implementing the risk-based cybersecurity and resilience program described in subsection (4). (4) A person or organization that operates a large-scale solar energy facility shall implement a risk-based cybersecurity and resilience program that is aligned with nationally recognized cybersecurity frameworks or guidance, including the National Institute of Standards and Technology or the Cybersecurity and Infrastructure Security Agency, without requiring compliance with any single framework or technology. (5) The risk-based cybersecurity and resilience program required under subsection (4) must be appropriate to the size, complexity, and reasonably foreseeable safety risks of the large-scale solar energy facility and may address identification of cyber risks, access controls, segmentation of systems, supply chain risk management, and periodic review and testing. (6) A person or organization that operates a large-scale solar energy facility may implement safeguards that are appropriate for the large-scale solar energy facility, including redundant systems, manual overrides, and continuity strategies. Compliance with this subsection may be achieved through existing employees and workforce models. (7) A person or organization that operates a large-scale solar energy facility shall maintain an incident response plan that provides for coordinating with emergency responders. Notification under this section is informational only and does not impose additional duties, costs, or liabilities on emergency responders or alter command authority under existing law. (8) A person or organization that operates a large-scale solar energy facility shall provide notice of a material cybersecurity incident as follows, to the extent practicable and soon as practicable, but not later than the time frames specified in this subsection: (a) Not later than 24 hours after discovery, to the Michigan state police and the local emergency management coordinator for the jurisdiction in which the large-scale solar energy facility is located. (b) Not later than 72 hours after discovery, a written summary that describes the incident at a high level that does not include details that would increase security risks if disclosed. (9) The attorney general may request documentation generated under this section only if the request is reasonably related to a material cybersecurity incident or the enforcement of this section based on a specific complaint alleging noncompliance. This subsection does not authorize the attorney general to engage in routine, recurring, or programmatic audits. Nothing in this subsection establishes standards beyond what is reasonably necessary for incident review or enforcement under this section. (10) Records or other information created or maintained under this section that describe specific security measures, vulnerabilities, protective systems, or incident response details are exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246, and must be treated as confidential. (11) Nothing in this section imposes duties, costs, or liabilities on a local unit of government, or requires a local unit of government to take action. (12) Nothing in this section requires changes to workforce levels, collective bargaining agreements, job classifications, staffing models, or contracting practices. This section does not encourage the outsourcing or displacement of bargaining-unit employees. (13) A person that knowingly or recklessly violates this section is subject to a civil fine of not more than $25,000.00 per day per violation. Each day that the violation continues constitutes a separate violation. The prosecutor of the county in which the violation occurred, or the attorney general, may bring an action to collect the fine. The attorney general shall provide written notice of an alleged violation and allow a reasonable opportunity, not to exceed 30 days, to cure the violation before commencing an action to collect a civil fine. (14) Ordinary mechanical failure, weather-related damage, manufacturing defects, or routine operational errors do not constitute a cybersecurity incident under this section unless the incident involves unauthorized access or manipulation of safety-critical systems. (15) As used in this section: (a) "Cyber compromise" means the loss of confidentiality, integrity, or availability of a safety-critical system in a manner that impairs, or has a substantial likelihood of impairing, the safe operation of a large-scale solar energy facility. (b) "Large-scale solar energy facility" means a solar electric generation facility that has a nameplate generating capacity of 50 megawatts or more, including associated on-site equipment, control systems, and any colocated energy storage system that supports facility operations. (c) "Material cybersecurity incident" means an event that results in, or is reasonably likely to result in, a cyber compromise of a safety-critical system. (d) "Safety-critical systems" means systems that are necessary for the safe operation of a large-scale solar energy facility, including colocated or integrated battery energy storage systems that support facility operations.